Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1038.
do enact as follows:AB1038,13Section 1. 71.05 (6) (b) 57. of the statutes is created to read:AB1038,2,2471.05 (6) (b) 57. a. Subject to subd. 57. b., for taxable years beginning after 1December 31, 2025, the amount of union dues and expenses paid by a private sector 2employee that are allocated for educational or training purposes.AB1038,2,53b. An individual may not claim the subtraction under this subdivision unless 4the individual is a member of a union that has a training facility located in this 5state.AB1038,2,66